Nevada, session 83, AB253.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 41.0307 is hereby amended to read as follows:
41.0307 As used in NRS 41.0305 to 41.039, inclusive:
1. “Employee” includes an employee of a:
(a) Part-time or full-time board, commission or similar body of
the State or a political subdivision of the State which is created by
law.
(b) Charter school.
-
*AB253*

– 2 –
(c) University school for profoundly gifted pupils described in
chapter 388C of NRS.
2. “Employment” includes any services performed by an
immune contractor.
3. “Immune contractor” means any [natural] :
(a) Natural person, professional corporation or professional
association which [:
(a) Is] is an independent contractor with the State pursuant to
NRS 333.700 [; and
(b) Contracts] and contracts to provide medical services for the
Department of Corrections.
[] As used in this [subsection,] paragraph, “professional
corporation” and “professional association” have the meanings
ascribed to them in NRS 89.020.
(b) Person authorized to provide care pursuant to an
agreement authorized by NRS 449.2455.
4. “Public officer” or “officer” includes:
(a) A member of a part-time or full-time board, commission or
similar body of the State or a political subdivision of the State which
is created by law.
(b) A public defender and any deputy or assistant attorney of a
public defender or an attorney appointed to defend a person for a
limited duration with limited jurisdiction.
(c) A district attorney and any deputy or assistant district
attorney or an attorney appointed to prosecute a person for a limited
duration with limited jurisdiction.
H
-
*AB253*